Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 4. Platting in Areas Outside Certain Municipalities.

Sec. 40.15.300.
Purposes of AS 40.15.300 — 40.15.380.

The purposes of AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

are to provide the public with an improved mechanism for the recording of plats for subdivisions in areas of the state identified in AS

40.15.305(a)

and to ensure that provision has been made for access to those subdivisions. AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

are not intended to provide the state with any authority to establish engineering or other standards for subdivisions beyond those expressly set out in AS 40.15.300 — 40.15.380.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.305.
Examination of plats before recording.

The commissioner shall exercise the platting authority for the state except within a municipality that has the power of land use regulation and that is exercising platting authority.

The commissioner shall review and approve each plat under AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

before the plat is recorded under AS 40.17. The approval by the commissioner shall be affixed to the plat in the form of the following statement:

The recorder may not accept for filing and recording a plat for which the commissioner’s approval is required under this section without the approval of the commissioner endorsed on the plat.

Within 45 days after a plat is filed, the commissioner shall approve the plat or return it to the applicant for modification or correction. Unless the applicant for plat approval consents to an extension of time, the plat is approved and a certificate of approval shall be issued by the commissioner if the commissioner fails to act within that period. The commissioner shall state in writing reasons for disapproval of a plat.

A recorded plat may not be altered or replatted except on petition of the state, a municipality, a public utility, or the owner of a majority of the land affected by the proposed alteration or replat. The petition shall be filed with the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a copy of the existing plat showing the proposed alteration or replat. The provisions of AS

29.40.130

and

29.40.140(a)

apply to an alteration or replat submitted under this subsection. The provisions of (d) of this section do not apply to an alteration or replat petition, but the commissioner shall state in writing reasons for disapproval of the petition.

In the case of a vacation of a street, right-of-way, or other public area, the provisions of AS

29.40.140(b)

and

29.40.160(a)

and (b) apply. When applying these provisions to land outside a municipality, the word “municipality” should be read as “state” when the context requires.

Notwithstanding another provision of AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

, the commissioner shall approve, without review under AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

, a plat under AS

38.04.045

that consists solely of land owned by the state. The commissioner may not charge a fee for the approval under this subsection.

PLAT APPROVAL This plat is approved by the commissioner of natural resources, or the commissioner’s designee, in accordance with . AS 40.15 Commissioner Date

Click to view

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For management of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 4.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.310.
Requirements for plat approval.

Each plat must show on its face a certificate of ownership, with the names and addresses of each owner listed. Each owner of record shall sign the certificate, and the signatures shall be acknowledged.

The surveyor preparing the plat shall sign and affix the seal of the surveyor.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Sec. 40.15.320.
Monuments.

In a subdivision with five or fewer lots, the existence of at least a 5/8 inch by 24 inch rebar and cap monument at controlling exterior corners of the subdivision shall be established by the surveyor.

In a subdivision of more than five lots, each interior corner shall be monumented with at least a 5/8 inch by 24 inch rebar and cap.

If a monument of record does not lie on the parcel or tract boundary, the plat shall reflect a boundary survey and tie to a monument of record.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.330.
Plat standards.

The commissioner shall establish plat standards by regulation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.340.
Engineering standards.

Except for subdivisions of state land, the commissioner may not establish engineering standards for subdivisions.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Sec. 40.15.350.
Certified copy of plat as evidence.

A copy of a plat certified by the recorder of the recording district in which it is filed or recorded as a true and complete copy of the original filed or recorded in the recording office for the district is admissible in evidence in all courts in the state with the same effect as the original.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Sec. 40.15.360.
Applicability.

The provisions of AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

do not apply to maps, site plans, or other graphic representations prepared for

the purpose of transferring a leasehold interest; the extraction of natural resources; or solely for the issuance of licenses or permits; or

disposing of land by aliquot part descriptions of 40 acres or more within surveyed sections provided that the least aliquot part unit shall be not less than a 1/4 1/4 section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.370.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

, but only those that are necessary and that are in accordance with the purposes stated in AS

40.15.300

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 40.15.380.
Applicability to governmental bodies; right-of-way acquisition plats.

Except as provided in this section and AS

40.15.305(g)

, AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

apply to the state, its agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions in the same manner and to the same extent that they apply to other landowners.

A plat for a subdivision created by the acquisition by the state, its agencies, instrumentalities, or political subdivisions, of a right-of-way, airport parcel, or land for a similar public purpose in an area outside a municipality that has the power of land use regulation and that is exercising platting authority, is subject only to the approval provisions of this section and any provision of AS

40.15.300

—

40.15.380

not in conflict with this section.

A right-of-way acquisition plat must contain the

location and name of the acquisition project;

approximate timetable for the acquisition and construction;

dimensions and area of the proposed tract, parcel, or parcels to be acquired and the remainder of the parcel or parcels;

name of the record owner or owners of the subject parcels;

signature and seal of the surveyor preparing the plat.

The commissioner shall review each right-of-way acquisition plat for compliance with this section. If the plat does not meet the requirements of this section, it shall be returned to the submitting agency with an explanation of the deficiencies. A plat for which the commissioner’s approval is required under AS

40.15.305

may not be recorded under AS 40.17 without the commissioner’s approval endorsed on the plat.

After approval by the commissioner, the original plat shall be filed with the appropriate district recorder within 30 days by the submitting agency.

The minimum monumentation requirements for

right-of-way acquisition subdivisions are a 5/8 inch by 24 inch reinforcement bar with appropriate identification cap set points from which the right-of-way may be defined, not exceeding 1,320 feet or, when line of sight permits, 2,640 feet; all recovered monumented property corners of records, the lines of which are intersected by a right-of-way acquisition, shall be monumented as part of the right-of-way plat, either on the right-of-way line or at the original monument position;

an airport parcel and land for a similar public purpose subdivision not defined by centerline shall be as provided in AS

40.15.320

.

If construction of improvements is scheduled to follow the right-of-way acquisition, the placement of the centerline monuments may be delayed until the improvements have been completed, in which case a statement designating the schedule for placing the monuments must be included on the plat.

The state, its agencies, instrumentalities, or political subdivisions may acquire or obtain conveyances, including dedication of lots or tracts of a right-of-way acquisition plat, before submittal of a right-of-way acquisition plat for approval by the commissioner. A right-of-way acquisition conveyance may be recorded before approval and recording of the right-of-way acquisition plat.

History.

(§ 10 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, in subsection (a), “AS

40.15.305(g)

” was substituted for “AS 40.15.300(g)” to correct a manifest typographical error in ch. 40, SLA 1998.

Administrative Code. —

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.